Arkansas, session 2025, HB1603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-13-226 is amended to read as
follows:
16-13-226. Installment payments by a criminal defendant in circuit
court — Priority of payment.
(a) An installment payment by a criminal defendant to a circuit court
shall initially be deemed to be a collection of court costs until the court
costs have been collected in full, with any remaining installment payments
representing collections of restitution, and then any applicable fines
allocated in accordance with § 5-4-208.
(b) If court costs, restitution, court costs, and fines are fully
paid, all remaining installment payments shall be allocated to remaining
amounts due as ordered by the circuit court.
(c) A municipal or county governing body that adopted municipal or
county legislation before January 1, 2017, to provide an alternative method
of installment payment allocation as then authorized by state law shall
remain in effect until repealed by the municipal or county governing body.
*CEB188*
02/26/2025 2:44:25 PM CEB188